New York, session 2025-2026, S6809.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 397-b of the general business law is amended by 2 adding two new subdivisions 3 and 4 to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no person 4 shall install a digital billboard after the effective date of this 5 subdivision, unless such billboard complies with the rules and regu- 6 lations promulgated by the commissioner of transportation pursuant to 7 subdivision four of this section. 8 4. The commissioner of transportation shall conduct a study on the 9 impact of digital billboards on the frequency and severity of motor 10 vehicle accidents, including but not limited to, such motor vehicle 11 accidents that result in severe bodily injury or death in proximity to 12 such digital billboards. Within one year of the effective date of this 13 subdivision, the commissioner of transportation shall: 14 (a) submit a report of their findings, conclusions and recommendations 15 to the governor, the temporary president of the senate and the speaker 16 of the assembly; and 17 (b) promulgate rules and regulations regarding the installation and 18 use of digital billboards based upon the findings of such study. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11257-01-5